bg-BG: Тип вал на извънбордов двигател: Изключително дълъг вал; Дълъг вал; Къс вал; Ултрадълъг вал; Друго
nb: Type propellskaft for påhengsmotor: Ekstra lang stamme; Lang stamme; Kort stamme; Ultralang stamme; Annet
th: ประเภทเพลามอเตอร์เรือนอก: เพลายาวพิเศษ; เพลายาว; เพลาสั้น; เพลายาวขั้นสุด; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 舷外机轴类型: 超长轴; 长轴; 短轴; 极长轴; 其他
hu: Függesztett csónakmotor tengelytípusa: Extra hosszú szár; Hosszú szár; Rövid szár; Ultra hosszú szár; Egyéb
zh-TW: 舷外機傳動軸類型: 特長軸; 長軸; 短軸; 超長軸; 其他
sk-SK: Typ hriadeľa prívesného motora: Extra dlhý hriadeľ; Dlhý hriadeľ; Krátky hriadeľ; Ultra dlhý hriadeľ; Iné
tr: Dıştan takma motor şaft tipi: Ekstra uzun şaft; Uzun şaft; Kısa şaft; Ultra uzun şaft; Diğer
ja: 船外機シャフトタイプ: エクストラロングシャフト; ロングシャフト; ショートシャフト; ウルトラロングシャフト; その他
fi: Perämoottorin akselin tyyppi: Erittäin pitkä riki; Pitkä riki; Lyhyt riki; Ultrapitkä riki; Muu
fr: Type d'arbre de moteur hors-bord: Arbre extra-long; Arbre long; Arbre court; Arbre ultra-long; Autre
el: Τύπος άξονας μετάδοσης κίνησης εξωλέμβιου κινητήρα: Πολύ μακρύς άξονας; Μακρύς άξονας; Κοντός άξονας; Υπερβολικά μακρύς άξονας; Άλλο
it: Tipo di albero del motore fuoribordo: Gambo extra lungo; Gambo lungo; Gambo corto; Gambo ultra lungo; Altro
nl: Type buitenboordmotoras: Extra lange staart; Lange staart; Korte staart; Ultra-lange staart; Overige
sl-SI: Vrsta gredi izvenkrmnega motorja: Zelo dolga peta; Dolga peta; Kratka peta; Izjemno dolga peta; Drugo
pl: Typ wału silnika zaburtowego: Bardzo długi wał; Długi wał; Krótki wał; Ultra długi wał; Inne
ro-RO: Tip de ax pentru motor de barcă: Ax extralung; Ax lung; Ax scurt; Ax ultralung; Altele
ru: Тип вала подвесного мотора: Сверхдлинный вал; Длинный вал; Короткий вал; Ультрадлинный вал; Другое
ko: 선외 모터 샤프트 유형: 엑스트라 롱 샤프트; 롱 샤프트; 숏 샤프트; 울트라 롱 샤프트; 기타
de: Schafttyp des Außenbordmotors: Extra-Langschaft; Langschaft; Kurzschaft; Ultra-Langschaft; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta osovine vanbrodskog motora: Ekstra duga osovina; Duga osovina; Kratka osovina; Ultra duga osovina; Ostalo
pt-BR: Motor de popa, tipo de eixo: Eixo extralongo; Eixo longo; Eixo curto; Eixo ultralongo; Outros
sv: Typ av axel för utombordsmotor: Extra lång rigg; Lång rigg; Kort rigg; Ultralång rigg; Övrigt
en: Outboard motor shaft type: Extra-long shaft; Long shaft; Short shaft; Ultra-long shaft; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de eixo do motor fora de borda: Eixo extralongo; Eixo longo; Eixo curto; Eixo ultralongo; Outro
vi: Loại trục động cơ gắn ngoài thuyền: Trục cực dài; Trục dài; Trục ngắn; Trục siêu dài; Khác
cs: Typ hřídele přívěsného motoru: Extra dlouhá hřídel; Dlouhá hřídel; Krátká hřídel; Ultra dlouhá hřídel; Ostatní
da: Skafttype for påhængsmotor: Ekstra langt ben; Langt ben; Kort ben; Ultra-langt ben; Andet
es: Tipo de eje del motor fuera de borda: Eje extralargo; Eje largo; Eje corto; Eje ultralargo; Otro
lt-LT: Pakabinamo variklio veleno tipas: Ypač ilgas velenas; Ilgas velenas; Trumpas velenas; Ultra ilgas velenas; Kita